devtools/ruletest/crk.phonology.xfscript
! Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

!! Definitions

define Bx [ %> | %< ] ;
  
define Ix [ i | i2 | ii2 ] ;
  
define Vowel [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] ;

define Consonant [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | ý ] ;
  
define Gx [ w | y | ý ] ;

!! Rules

!! VG>i2 -> VV

! ##locative, dim, poss -im VGi > V: - i from *e, i2 (CHANGE OTHER i2)
! ##-i2hk, -i2nâhk, -i2s(is), -i2m
! ##also for possessive suffixes -i2nân, -i2naw/-i2nânaw, -i2wâw, -i2yiw(a)
! ##also for VTAs, done below

define VGi2aaRule [ [ a | â ] [ Gx | "^COM" ] %> i2 -> â %> ] ;

define VGi2eeRule [ ê [ Gx | "^COM" ] %> i2 -> ê %> ] ;

define VGi2iiRule [ [ i | î ] [ Gx | "^COM" ] %> i2 -> î %> ] ;

define VGi2ooRule [ [ o | ô ] [ Gx | "^COM" ] %> i2 -> ô %> ] ;

define VGi2VVRule [ VGi2aaRule .o. VGi2eeRule .o. VGi2iiRule .o. VGi2ooRule ] ;

!!€ mêskanaw>i2^DIMs
!!€ mêskanâ000s 

!!€ mêskanaw>i2hk
!!€ mêskanâ000hk

!!€ sôniyâw>i2^DIMs
!!€ sôniyâ000s0

!!€ miskotâkay>i2^DIMs
!!€ miskocâkâ000s0

!!€ nâpêw>i2^DIMsis
!!€ nâpê0000sis

!!€ iskwêw>i2^DIMsis
!!€ iskwê0000sis

!!€ maskosiy>i2^DIMs
!!€ maskosî0000s

!!€ pikiw>i2^DIMs
!!€ pikî0000s

!!€ maskosiy>i2hk
!!€ maskosî000hk

!!€ sîwâpoy>i2^DIMs
!!€ sîwâpô0000s

!!€ tohtôsâpoy>i2hk
!!€ tohtôsâpô000hk

! #iiRule i-i2 > i

define iiRule [ i2 -> 0 || i Bx _ ] ;

!!€ wâwi>i2^DIMs
!!€ wâwi000s

!!€ ôsi>i2hk
!!€ ôsi00hk

! #Cwi > Co (i and i2)

define Cwi2CoôRule [ w %> [ i | i2 ] -> %> o , w %> ii2 -> %> ô  || Consonant _ ] ;

!!€ atimw>i2^DIMs
!!€ acimo000s

!!€ mistikw>i2hk
!!€ mistiko00hk
! 
! #no change after plain consonants, i2:i
! 
!!€ sâkahikan>i2^DIMs
!!€ sâkahikan0i0s

!!€ maskisin>i2hk
!!€ maskisin0ihk
! 
! ## Cw# > C

define wFinalRule [ w -> 0 || Consonant _ .#. ] ;

!!€ atimw
!!€ atim0

!!€ askihkw
!!€ askihk0

!!€ nit2<nînihikw
!!€ ni00nînihik

define etanRule [ a -> ê || _ %> t â n .#. ] ;

!!€ a>tân
!!€ ê0tân

! ##diminutive sound symbolism palatalisation (requires DIM trigger?)
! #{t,t2} > c / _...DIM

define DimRule [ t -> c || _ ?* "^DIM" ] ;

! #nicascocinis
!!€ nit2<astotin>i2^DIMs
!!€ nic0ascocin0i0s

!!!!!! 
! ! 
! ! ##connecting t - independent verbs, possessed nouns
! ! ##t2 > t / _V

define t2epenthesisRule [ t2 -> 0 || _ %< Consonant ,, t2 -> t || _ %< Vowel ] ;

! define t-epenthesisDimRule [ t2 -> c || _ %< Vowel ?* "^DIM" ] ;

! ! #nitapin - VAI 1Sg
! !!€ nit2<api>n
! !!€ nit0api0n
! 
! #kitapinaw - VAI 12Pl
! !!€ kit2<api>n 
! !!€ kit0api0n
! 
! #otastotin - NI Px3Sg 
! !!€ ot2<astotin
! !!€ ot0astotin
! 
! ! 
! ! ##o>w for certain possessed nouns (but these are dependent, why not handled with kinship?)
! ! ##previously seen before î, a, â?, and iy (phonetically îy)
! ! ##new tag w2 (can become w2 after other changes, discussed for VTA-2)
! ! 
! ! #wiyâw
! o:w %<:0 i y â w2:w
! 
! !!€ o>iyâw2
! !!€ w0iyâw
! 
! #wîpit
! o:w %<:0 î p i t 
! 
! !!€ o>îpit
! !!€ w0îpit
! 
! #wahkwan
! o:w %<:0 a h k w a n
! 
! !!€ o>ahkwan
! !!€ w0ahkwan 
! ! 
! ! 
! ! ##ê > â _-n - independent 1/2 VAI-v, VTI-v

! "h-epenthesisRule"
! %^EGLOT:h <=> :Vowel ( %^IC:0 ) _ %<:0 [ d1:0 | d2:0 | :Vowel ] ;

define h2epenthesisRule [ "^EGLOT" -> h || Vowel _ %< Vowel ] .o. [ "^EGLOT" -> 0 ] ;

!!€ ê^EGLOT<acimo>t
!!€ êh0acimo0t

!!€ ê^EGLOT<d1ay2<acimo>t
!!€ êh00ay0acimo0t

!!€ ê^EGLOT<d2ay3d1âh<acimo>t
!!€ êh00ay0âh0acimo0t

define ee2aaVAIRule [ ê -> â || _ %> n2 ] ;

! #ninêhiyawân - VAI 1Sg
!!€ nit2<nêhiyawê>n2 
!!€ ni00nêhiyawâ0n
!  
! #kikâsîhkwân
!!€ kit2<kâsîhkwê>n2
!!€ ki00kâsîhkwâ0n
! 
! 
! ##a > ê / _-n - independent 1/2 VTI-t
! -an > -ên

define a2eeVTIRule [ a -> ê || _ %> n2 ] ;

! #nitipiskên
!!€ nit2<tipiska>n2 
!!€ ni00tipiskê0n
! 
! #kikiskêyihtên
!!€ kit2<kiskêyihta>n2 
!!€ ki00kiskêyihtê0n
! 
! ! 
! ! 
! ! ##n-final VIIs that take -hk NEW SPECIAL CHARACTER (adapt for VAI-n?? e.g. n2 > 0 / _-hk)
! ! ## n > h / _-k

define n2hRule [ n3 -> h || _ %> k ] ;

! ! #ê-nîpihk
!!€ ê-<nîpin3>k 
!!€ ê-0nîpih0k

define n20VIIRule [ n -> 0 || _ %> k ] ;

! #ê-mispok
!!€ ê-<mispon>k 
!!€ ê-0mispo00k
! 

! Changes t4 to c when ikâtê follows in VTI

define t2cVTIRule [ t4 -> c || _ %> i k â t ê ] .o. [ t4 -> t ] ;

! #wapâhcikâtêw - V+TI+Der/X+V+II+3Sg
! w â p a h t:c %>:0 i k â t ê %> w  
! 
!!€ wapâht4>ikâtê>w 
!!€ wapâhc0ikâtê0w


! ##VTAs
! ##VTA-1
! 
! #no changes, but some marked exceptions
! #w2 so mowêw and ayawêw don't contract (wîcêwêw can do both - code two stems?)
! 
! #ê-mowiht - VTA X>3SgO
! ê - %<:0 m o w2:w %>:0 i2:i h t 

! Immutable 'w', which does not require rule

!!€ ê-<mow2>i2ht
!!€ ê-0mow0iht
! 
! #ê-ayawikoyâhk
!!€ ê-<ayaw2>i2koyâhk
!!€ ê-0ayaw0ikoyâhk 
! 
! ##VTA-3(Cw) act like Cw nouns for all i2 and i suffixes (summarised below)
! #mark as normal w, w>o applies for i and i2
! #seem to need î2? for delayed 2>1 imp
! 
! #kikîskison - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kit2<kîskisw>in
!!€ ki00kîskiso00n
! 
! #nikîskisomâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
!!€ nit2<kîskisw>i2mâwa
!!€ ni00kîskiso00mâwa
! 
! #ê-kîskisotân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2tân
!!€ ê-0kîskiso00tân
! 
! #ê-kîskisot
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>it 
!!€ ê-0kîskiso00t
! 
! #ê-kîskisosk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2sk 
!!€ ê-0kîskiso00sk
! 
! #ê-kîskisokoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-0kîskiso00koyâhk
!  
! #nikîskisokawin - VTA X>1SgO
!!€ nit2<kîskisw>i2kawin
!!€ ni00kîskiso00kawin
! 
! #kîskison - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kîskisw>in 
!!€ kîskiso00n
! 
! #kîskisôhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kîskisw>ii2hkan
!!€ kîskisô00hkan

! ##VTA-2(aw)
! ##requires new coding, i2 instead of WI trigger
! ##i does not trigger VGi > V:
! #i2 for all 1>2, -im... -iko..., -ikawi..., -i2sk, -i2ht, -i2hcik
! #î2 does not collapse
! 
! #kinitonawin - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kit2<nitonaw>in 
!!€ ki00nitonaw0in
! 
! #ninitonâmâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
!!€ nit2<nitonaw>i2mâwa
!!€ ni00nitonâ000mâwa
! 
! #ê-nitonawitân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>i2tân
!!€ ê-0nitonâ000tân
! 
! #ê-kîskisot
! 
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>it 
!!€ ê-0nitonaw0it
! 
! #ê-nitonâsk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>i2sk 
!!€ ê-0nitonâ000sk
!  
! #ê-nitonâkoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
!!€ ê-<nitonaw>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-0nitonâ000koyâhk
! 
! #ninitonâkawin - VTA X>1SgO
!!€ nit2<nitonaw>i2kawin
!!€ ni00nitonâ000kawin
! 
! #nitonawin - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ nitonaw>in 
!!€ nitonaw0in
! 
! #nitonawîhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ nitonaw>îhkan
!!€ nitonaw0îhkan
! 
! 
! ##VTA-4 (t3) 
! ## t3 > s / _{-i,-î2}; t3 > t / _-i2  

define t2sVTA4Rule [ t3 -> s || _ [ %> [ i | ii2 ] ] | .#. ,, t3 -> t || _ %> i2] ;

!!€ it3>i 
!!€ is0i
!
! #kinakasin - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kit2<nakat3>in 
!!€ ki00nakas0in
! 
! #ninakatimâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
!!€ nit2<nakat3>i2mâwa 
!!€ ni00nakat0imâwa
! 
! #ê-nakatitân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<nakat3>i2tân 
!!€ ê-0nakat0itân
! 
! #ê-nakasit
!!€ ê-<nakat3>it
!!€ ê-0nakas0it
! 
! #ê-nakatisk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<nakat3>i2sk 
!!€ ê-0nakat0isk
! 
! #ê-nakatikoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
!!€ ê-<nakat3>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-0nakat0ikoyâhk
! 
! #ninakatikawin - VTA X>1SgO
!!€ nit2<nakat3>i2kawin
!!€ ni00nakat0ikawin
! 
! #nakasin - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ nakat3>in 
!!€ nakas0in
! 
! #nakasîhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ nakat3>ii2hkan 
!!€ nakas0îhkan
! 
! 
! ##VTA idiosyncratic cases
! #s > 0 / _ t3-i -  just kostew

! "t3kostewRule"
! s:0 <=> _ t3:s ;

define t3kostewRule [ s -> 0 || _ s %> ] ; ! Needs to happen after t2sVTA4Rule

! #kikosin - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kit2<kost3>in 
!!€ ki00ko0s0in
! 
! #nikostimâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
!!€ nit2<kost3>i2mâwa 
!!€ ni00kost0imâwa
! 
! #ê-kostitân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<kost3>i2tân
!!€ ê-0kost0itân
! 
! #ê-kosit
!!€ ê-<kost3>it 
!!€ ê-0ko0s0it
! 
! #ê-kostisk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
!!€ ê-<kost3>i2sk
!!€ ê-0kost0isk
! 
! #ê-kostikoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
!!€ ê-<kost3>i2koyâhk
!!€ ê-0kost0ikoyâhk
!  
! #nikostikawin - VTA X>1SgO
!!€ nit2<kost3>i2kawin
!!€ ni00kost0ikawin
! 
! #kosin - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kost3>in 
!!€ ko0s0in
! 
! #kosîhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
!!€ kost3>ii2hkan 
!!€ ko0s0îhkan
! 
! ##monosyllabic VTAs in the imp 2Sg>3Sg "TACONJ-5"
! #these have i as the inflection - ahêw, kostêw, itêw, ay-itêw
! #should be ahi, kosi, isi, ay-isi (by my logic, need to be checked)
! #making this i3 instead of i2 
! #i3 > i / _ # << i3 must act like i or î2, not i2
! #i3 > 0 otherwise << deletion rule can be tested with kostêw above
! #itêw has been marked as TACONJ-1, but it definitely has t>s in corpus
! 
! #isi - VTA imp 2Sg>3SgO
! i t3:s %>:0 i3:i 

! The following morphophonological changes implemented with their own
! specific continuation lexica

! !!€ it3>i3
! !!€ is0i
! 
! #kosi
! k o s:0 t3:s %>:0 i3:i 
! 
! !!€ kost3>i3 
! !!€ ko0s0i
! 
! #ahi
! a h %>:0 i3:i
! 
! !!€ ah>i3 
! !!€ ah0i

! Needed for diminutivization of mîwas with stem-final t3

define t3DimRule [ t3 -> c || _ %> i2 "^DIM" ] ;

!!€ mi4<îwat3>i2^DIMs
!!€ m00îwac0i0s

! Matching weak/strong reduplication consonant placeholder d1 with stem-initial consonant
! "ReduplCRule1"
!! __@RULENAME@__
! d1:Cx <=> _ (0:i 0:y) [ a: [ y2: | ý2 ] | â: h ] (%^IC:0) ( %-: ) %<:0 Cx: ;
!    where Cx in ( c k m n p s t w y ) ;

define ReduplRule [ [ d1 | d2 ] -> c || _ [ \%< ]+ %< c ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> h || _ [ \%< ]+ %< h ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> h || _ [ \%< ]+ %< h ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> k || _ [ \%< ]+ %< k ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> m || _ [ \%< ]+ %< m ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> n || _ [ \%< ]+ %< n ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> p || _ [ \%< ]+ %< p ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> s || _ [ \%< ]+ %< s ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> t || _ [ \%< ]+ %< t ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> w || _ [ \%< ]+ %< w ,, [ d1 | d2 ] -> y || _ [ \%< ]+ %< [ y | ý ] ] .o. [ [ y2 | ý2 | y3 ] -> y || [ d1 | d2 ] ?* _ ] .o. [ [ d1 | d2 ] -> 0 ] .o. [ [ y2 | y3 ] -> 0 ] ;

!!€ d1ay2-<nipâw
!!€ na0-0nipâw

!!€ d1âh-<nipâw
!!€ nâh-0nipâw

!!€ d2ay3-d1âh-<nipâw
!!€ na0-nâh-0nipâw

!!€ d2ay3-d1âh-<ayâw
!!€ 0ay-0âh-0ayâw

!!€ d1âh-<ayâw
!!€ 0âh-0ayâw

!!€ d1ay2-<ayâw
!!€ 0ay-0ayâw

!! INITIAL CHANGE
! a ~ ê
! i ~ ê
! o ~ ê ! W-A corpus evidence
! â ~ iyâ
! ê ~ iyê
! î ~ â (iyî)
! ô ~ iyô

! General Template
! v1:v2 <=> .#. (C) _ :* %^IC:0 ;

define ICRule [ a -> ê || .#. (Consonant (w)) _ ?* "^IC" ,,  i -> ê || .#. (Consonant (w)) _ ?* "^IC" ,, o -> ê || .#. (Consonant) w _ ?* "^IC" ,, [..] -> [ i y ] || .#. (Consonant (w)) _ [ â | ê | ô ] ?* "^IC" ,, î -> [ â | [ i y î ]] || .#. (Consonant (w)) _ ?* "^IC" ,, o -> [ w ê ] || .#. (Consonant - w) _ ?* "^IC" ] .o. [ "^IC" -> 0 ] ;

!!€ nipât^IC
!!€ nêpât0

!!€ miyo-nipât^IC
!!€ mêyo-nipât0

!!€ itwêt^IC
!!€ êtwêt0

!!€ apit^IC
!!€ êpit0

!!€ wayawit^IC
!!€ wêyawit0

!!€ îkatêhtêt^IC
!!€ âkatêhtêt0
!!€ iyîkatêhtêt

!!€ nîmit^IC
!!€ nâmit0
!!€ niyîmit

!!€ 0ohcît^IC
!!€ wêhcît0

!!€ m0ostohtêt^IC
!!€ mwêstohtêt0

! o ~ wê

!!€ 0oyôyot^IC
!!€ wêyôyot0

!!€ k0ocît^IC
!!€ kwêcît0

! î ~ (â) iyî
! ê ~ iyê
! â ~ iyâ
! ô ~ iyô

!!€ îkatêhât^IC
!!€ âkatêhât0
!!€ iyîkatêhât

!!€ 00êskêt^IC
!!€ iyêskêt0

!!€ 00âcimot^IC
!!€ iyâcimot0

!!€ 00ôhkomit^IC
!!€ iyôhkomit0

define w2oNDRule [ w3 %< -> 0 || .#. _ [ o | ô ] ,, w3 %< -> o || .#. _ Consonant ] .o. [ w3 -> w ] ;

! "i20NDRule"
! i:0 <=> .#. w3:o _ %<:0 ;

!!€ w3<spiton
!!€ o0spiton

!!€ ni<spiton
!!€ ni0spiton

!!€ ki<spiton
!!€ ki0spiton

!!€ w3<îpit
!!€ w0îpit

!!€ w3<ahkwan
!!€ w0ahkwan

! n3:n

! n3<o -> nô
! n<i<tanis
! ni<tanis

! [nk]i<V[^o] -> [nk]0<V
! [nk]i<o -> [nk]0<ô
